Washington statutes.
RCW 36.32.410

Participation in Economic Opportunity Act programs.

The board of county commissioners of any county is hereby authorized and empowered in its discretion by resolution or ordinance passed by a majority of the board, to take whatever action it deems necessary to enable the county to participate in the programs set forth in the Economic Opportunity Act of 1964 (Public Law 88-452; 78 Stat. 508), as amended. Such participation may be engaged in as a sole county operation or in conjunction or cooperation with the state, any other county, city, or municipal corporation, or any private corporation qualified under said Economic Opportunity Act.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 177 s 1; 1965 c 14 s 1.]